Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB249.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIII-FSCHOOL COUNSELING SERVICESSection 1301-F. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Administrative activities." Activities that are not directly related to the plan and that are absent of any direct student services or interaction.1234567891011121314151617181920 "Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Direct services." As follows:(1) Services that are provided through face-to-face contact with students.(2) The term includes the following:(i) Classroom instruction.(ii) Individual and group counseling for students.(iii) Responsive services on behalf of a student whose academic or career development is at risk. Responsive services include the administration of a risk-assessment.(iv) Interventions for a student who is:(A) at risk of dropping out of school; or(B) exhibiting dangerous behaviors, such as drug use, self-harm or gang activity."Indirect services." Consultations among a student, a parent or legal guardian of the student, school staff and community agencies concerning the student's academic or career needs."Plan." The school counseling plan under section 1302-F."School entity." Any of the following:(1) A school district of any class.(2) An intermediate unit as described in Article IX-A.(3) A charter school as defined in section 1703-A.(4) A cyber charter school as defined in section 1703-A.(5) A regional charter school as defined in section 1703-A.(6) An area career and technical school as described in section 1841.Section 1302-F. School counseling plan.20250HB0249PN0199 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authorization and purpose.--A school entity shall develop and implement a written school counseling plan that ensures that student services are coordinated in a manner that provides academic or career developmental support to all students of the school entity.(b) Requirements generally.--A plan shall:(1) Be implemented by a Pennsylvania-certified school counselor.(2) Utilize nationally recognized and State-recognized counselor frameworks, which may not include medical guidance, social and emotional learning, critical race theory or behavioral health.(3) Be reviewed annually and updated as needed by the school counselor, in collaboration with the affected building principal and other stakeholders, including parents or legal guardians of enrolled students.(4) Be systemically aligned to kindergarten through grade 12 within the school entity.(c) Components.--A plan shall contain the following:(1) A foundation component that includes:(i) A vision statement.(ii) A mission statement.(iii) Plan goals.(2) A management component that utilizes assessments and other data to develop, implement and evaluate the plan.(3) A delivery component that focuses on direct services and indirect services through the implementation of the plan.(4) An accountability component that ensures regular analysis of the plan.(d) Guidance.--A plan shall:20250HB0249PN0199 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Guide students in academic pursuits and career planning.(2) Follow the school counseling plan guidance provided by the department that is limited to academic pursuits and career planning.Section 1303-F. School counselor use of time.(a) General requirement.--A school entity shall allot sufficient time for the school entity's counselor to carry out the duties stated in the school entity's plan.(b) Direct services and indirect services.--Direct services and indirect services may be provided in collaboration with other school personnel, parents or legal guardians, as provided herein or otherwise deemed appropriate, and include:(1) Providing academic advisement services, including:(i) Developing an individual planning system to guide a student to access and monitor the student's own academic and career progress.(ii) Guiding a student along the pathways to graduation.(iii) Guiding a student in goal-setting and course selection aligned with the student's post-secondary goals, including college education, trade and industrial education and military service.(iv) Addressing accelerated learning opportunities.(v) Addressing academic deficits and the accessibility of resources.(vi) Providing student assessment reviews, interest inventories or academic results needed to develop, review and revise a student's plan of study.(vii) Providing support for students who show 20250HB0249PN0199 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 potential so they are more likely to engage in rigorous coursework and take advantage of post-secondary opportunities.(2) Providing a career-planning process, including:(i) Guidance in understanding the relationship between classroom performance and success in school and beyond.(ii) The provision of resources to identify career interests and aptitudes to assist a student in age-appropriate college and career planning, including trade and industrial education and military service.(iii) Guidance in understanding the advantages of completing career certifications, Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps, apprenticeships and internships.(iv) Interpretation of augmented, criterion-referenced or norm-referenced assessments for students and parents or guardians of students.(v) The provision of information to a parent or legal guardian of a student, such as through workshops on preparing for college, a trade, military service, financial aid and career opportunities.(vi) Encouragement to a parent or legal guardian of a student to support partnerships in the student's learning and career-planning processes.(3) Providing skills designed to:(i) Address bullying, including:(A) Training programs for school employees regarding how to recognize bullying behaviors.(B) Protocols for responding to bullying that is 20250HB0249PN0199 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occurring in the school entity.(C) Strategies that support a student who is being bullied.(D) Protocols for immediate parental or legal guardian inclusion when responding to all bullying activity, including initial and subsequent interactions with students. Anti-bullying materials must be shared with parents or legal guardians in advance of being shared with students.(ii) Address suicide through:(A) Strategies that help identify a student who is at risk for suicide. Parents or legal guardians must be immediately notified if their student is considered at risk for suicide.(B) Strategies and protocols that help a student who is at risk for suicide, including parental or legal guardian involvement, absent good cause shown as to why the parent or legal guardian should not be involved. If a parent or legal guardian is not involved, the school entity must obtain a court order to that effect.(C) Protocols for responding to a suicide death.(4) Intervening with students who are at risk of dropping out of school to determine if there is a way to keep the students in school.(5) Providing orientation programs for new students and transferring students at each level of education.(6) Serving as a contributing member of decision-making teams and programs, which include:(i) Teams that are convened under section 504 of the 20250HB0249PN0199 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.).(ii) Multitiered System of Supports or Response to Intervention teams.(iii) English language learner programs.(iv) Parental or legal guardian involvement or family engagement programs.(v) Advanced placement and gifted and talented programs.(c) Administrative activities.--Administrative activities provided by a school counselor in collaboration with other school personnel include:(1) Coordinating State assessments, cognitive achievement assessments, advanced placement programs and language acquisition testing programs.(2) Developing master schedules.(3) Coordinating the following:(i) Teams that are convened under section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.(ii) Response to Intervention teams.(iii) English language learner programs.(iv) Parental or legal guardian involvement or family engagement programs.(v) Advanced placement and gifted and talented programs.(vi) Data entry.(4) Monitoring students in common areas, such as the cafeteria, a hallway, the playground or bus lines.Section 1304-F. Posting the school counseling plan.A school entity shall post its school counseling plan on the 20250HB0249PN0199 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school entity's publicly accessible Internet website or, in the alternative, on the publicly accessible Internet website of the school entity's school district, under the category of State-required information.Section 1305-F. Parental notification and private right of action.(a) Policy.--The governing body of a school entity in the Commonwealth shall adopt a policy concerning school guidance and counseling programs in the schools under its jurisdiction. At a minimum, the policy shall contain the following:(1) A provision for written notification, at least annually or more frequently if required in the policy, to parents or legal guardians about the academic and career guidance programs that are available to their children. The notification shall include the purpose and general description of the programs, information regarding ways parents or legal guardians may review materials to be used in guidance and counseling programs at their child's school and information about the procedures by which parents or legal guardians may limit their child's participation in the programs. If social or emotional programs are available or provided, parents or legal guardians must be provided notice of the programs and the associated materials at least two weeks prior to student engagement with the program.(2) A provision prohibiting the use of counseling techniques that are beyond the scope of the professional certification or training of school counselors, including counseling techniques that are normally employed in medical or clinical settings and focus on mental illness, behavioral health or psychopathology.20250HB0249PN0199 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A provision requiring that information and records of social and emotional counseling be kept confidential and separate from a student's educational records and not disclosed to third parties without prior parental consent or as otherwise provided by law.(4) A provision with respect to social and emotional counseling stating the procedures by which parents or legal guardians can elect in writing to have their child opt in to the counseling. In no event shall a governing body require affirmative parental consent for one-time counseling that is needed to maintain order, discipline or prevent immediate harm to a student. Parents or legal guardians must be present at all times that a student is counseled in the context of social and emotional learning or counseling.(5) A provision that provides for the meaningful inclusion of a parent or legal guardian when a student receives direct services or indirect services from a school counselor.(b) Private right of action.--If a parent or legal guardian of a student reasonably believes that the parent or legal guardian has been denied meaningful involvement in counseling or access to the student when receiving direct services or indirect services from a school counselor without good cause, the parent or legal guardian shall have a private right of action against the governing body of the school entity.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0249PN0199 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526